src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Cornish morphology

First, we declare multicharacter symbols

## POS
* +N +V +A           
* +Adv +CC +CS +Interj +Pron +Num +Pr         
* +Smut +Mmut +Pmut +Amut                for mutation
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

## Verbal MSP
+Prs +Fut +Prt +Prf +Ipf +Plf       
+Ind +Imp +Sbj       
+Inf +Sit ! what is +Sit?       
+Pos +Neg +ConNeg       
+1Sg +2Sg +3Sg +1Pl +2Pl +3Pl       
+Impers       
+Ptc       
+VN       

## Nominal MSP
+Sg +Pl +P            
+Nom +Acc +Gen        
+Ord       

## Pronominal MSP
+Suff +Emph +Indef         
+Msc +Fem                  

Diacritical marks, to trigger
morphophonological rules.
The "%" symbol literalises the next symbol

%^S %^A %^P %^M %^V %^E        
%> %^D                         
%^UML %^CD %^TRUNC %^STDEL     

## Archiphonemes
 e3             e to o in plural
 a4 o4         Umlaut phonemes, changing to e

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
* **»7**:  Literal »
* **«7**:  Literal «
```
 %[%>%]  - Literal >
 %[%<%]  - Literal <
```

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ | For preprocessing
|  @R.ErrOrth.ON@ | resetting ErrOrth flag
|  @C.ErrOrth@ | clearing ErrOrth Flag.

* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

# Key lexicon

* LEXICON Root        
    - Adverb ;	           
    - Noun ;		           
    - Propernoun ;           
    - Preposition ;          
    - Conjunction ;          
    - Subjunction ;          
    - Verb ;		           
    - Adjective ;	           
    - Interjection ;         
    - Numeral ;	           
    - Pronoun ;	           
    - Punctuation ;          
    - Symbols     ;          

Adhoc lexica, to be fixed

* LEXICON ENDLEX       
* LEXICON RNum       
* LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS        

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-cor/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
